Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NATIONAL AMERICAN INDIAN VETERANS; REPORT.new text end new text begin (a) $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for a grant to the congressionally chartered National American Indian Veterans (NAIV) to provide services to American Indian veterans. NAIV must use the grant money to provide the following support and services to American Indian veterans who are residents of the state: new text end new text begin (1) peer support outreach and benefits engagement; new text end new text begin (2) staffing at Minnesota Native American Veteran Stand Down events; new text end new text begin (3) culturally informed mental health services; new text end new text begin (4) cultural resilience retreats; and new text end new text begin (5) veteran transition and reentry support. new text end new text begin (b) By January 15, 2027, NAIV must report to the commissioner and to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over veterans regarding the uses of grant money, including any amount used for grant administration. The report must be filed with the Legislative Reference Library in compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 3.195. new text end